Utah statutes.
48-3a-804.   Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint must state with particularity:

(1)  the date and content of plaintiff's demand and the response by the managers or other members to the demand; or

(2)  why the demand should be excused as futile.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

